Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
CHAPTER 7 Motor Carriers

46-7-1 through 46-7-101.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1931, p. 199, §§ 3-9, 12-20, 26-30, 32; Code 1933, §§ 68-603—68-614, 68-617—68-619, 68-621—68-623, 68-625, 68-629—68-634, 68-9911; Ga. L. 1937, p. 469, § 1; Ga. L. 1937, p. 730, § 2; Ga. L. 1943, p. 351, § 1; Ga. L. 1950, p. 186, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 376, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 418, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 641, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 643, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1980, p. 475, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 618, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1119, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 462, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 529, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1474, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1283, §§ 3, 4, 6, 7; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 46; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1607, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1238, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 950, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 9-4; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1583, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1378, §§ 9, 10; Ga. L. 2003, p. 426, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 361, § 46; Ga. L. 2004, p. 366, §§ 3-10, 13, 14, 16-21; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 46; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, §§ 28-2, 28-2.1, 28-3, 28-4, 28-5.1, 28-5.2, 28-6/HB 501; Ga. L. 2007, p. 679, §§ 2-4/HB 389; Ga. L. 2008, p. 450, § 1/SB 384; Ga. L. 2009, p. 629, §§ 3-6, 9/HB 57; Ga. L. 2010, p. 409, § 2/SB 392; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 46/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2010, p. 932, §§ 31, 32/HB 396; Ga. L. 2011, p. 479, §§ 19-24/HB 112; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 46/HB 142; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 580, § 16/HB 865, effective July 1, 2012.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Sections 46-7-100 and 46-7-101 (Article 5) (Ga. L. 1983, p. 735, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 2022, § 3), relating to motor vehicle safety inspections, were repealed by Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 9-4, effective July 1, 2001.

This chapter consisted of Code Sections

46-7-1

through

46-7-1

2, 46-7-12.1, 46-7-13 through 46-7-15, 46-7-15.1, 46-7-16 through 46-7-39 (Article 1), 46-7-50 through 46-7-79 (Article 2), 46-7-85.1 through 46-7-85.21 (Article 3), and 46-7-90 through 46-7-92 (Article 4). For the Georgia Motor Carrier Act of 2012, see O.C.G.A. §

40-1-50

et seq.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 580, § 16/HB 865 repealed and reserved this chapter, effective July 1, 2012.